FOMA_Scripts/german.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +NN +Masc +Fem +Neut +Sg +Plural +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen +Umlaut +V +Infinit +PastP +Present +um -a -is -us +umu +uma +umo -on -s -um +prefix +ge

LEXICON Root
NFem_0_n ;
NMasc_en_en ;
NMasc_s_$;
VVReg;
NFem-a/en ;
NFem-in;
NFem-is/en;
NFem-is/iden;
NFem-s/$sse;
NFem-s/sse;
NFem-s/ssen;
NFem/Sg;
NFem_0_$;
NFem_0_e;
NFem_0_$e;
NFem_0_en;
Nq/Pl_x;
NFem_0_s;
NFem_0_n;
NMasc-s/Sg;
NMasc-ns;
NMasc-s/$sse;
NMasc-us/en;
NMasc/Sg_es;
NMasc_en_en;
NMasc/Sg_s;
NMasc_0_x;
NMasc-s/sse;
NMasc-us/i;
NMasc/Sg_0;
NMasc_es_$e;
NMasc_es_$er;
NMasc_es_e;
NMasc_es_en;
NMasc_n_n;
NMasc_s_$x;
NMasc_s_0;
NMasc_s_e;
NMasc_s_en;
NMasc_s_n;
NMasc_s_s;
NMasc_s_x;
NNeut-0/ien;
NNeut-Herz;
NNeut-a/en;
NNeut-on/a;
NNeut-s/$sser;
NNeut-um/a;
NNeut-a/ata;
NMasc_s_$x;
NNeut-um/en;
NNeut/Pl;
NNeut/Sg_s;
NNeut/Sg_es;
NNeut_0_x;
NNeut_es_$e;
NNeut_es_e;
NNeut_es_en;
NNeut_es_er;
NNeut_s_$;
NNeut_s_0;
NNeut_s_e;
NNeut_s_en;
NNeut_s_n;
NNeut_s_s;
NNeut_es_$er;
NNeut_s_x;


LEXICON Nq/Pl_x
Peanuts    Nq/Pl_xSPinf;
Ferien     Nq/Pl_xSPinf;
Eltern     Nq/Pl_xSPinf;




LEXICON Nq/Pl_xSPinf
+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;


LEXICON NMasc-s/Sg
Hass+NN+Nom+Sg:Hass #;
Hass+NN+Acc+Sg:Hass #;
Hass+NN+Dat+Sg:Hase #;
Hass+NN+Dat+Sg:Hases #;
Hass+NN+Gen+Sg:Hasses #;



LEXICON NFem-s/$sse
Nuss+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:Nuss #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:Nuss #;

Nuss+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:Nüssen #;
Nuss+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:Nüsse #;

LEXICON NFem-s/ssen
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:Stewardess #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:Stewardess #;

Stewardess+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:Stewardessen #;
Stewardess+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:Stewardessen #;

LEXICON NNeut-Herz
Herz+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:Herz #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:Herzs #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:Herzen #;
Herz+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:Herzen #;




LEXICON NFem_0_n
Rose	NFem_0_nSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Satellit NMasc_en_enSPinf;


LEXICON NMasc_en_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^en  #;
+Masc+NN+Sg:0   #;
+Masc+NN+Plural:^en  #;


LEXICON NFem_0_nSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON VVReg
abonnier VVRegSPinf;

LEXICON VVRegSPinf
+V+Infinit:^en #;
+V+PastP:^+get #;



LEXICON NFem-a/en
Agenda    NFem-a/enSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-a/enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-a^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-a^en #;

LEXICON  NFem-in
Forscherin    NFem-inSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-inSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^nen #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^nen #;

LEXICON NFem-is/en
Krisis    NFem-is/enSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-is/enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-is^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-is^en #;

LEXICON NFem-is/iden
Meningitis    NFem-is/idenSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-is/idenSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:-is^iden #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:-is^iden #;

LEXICON NFem-s/sse
Wildnis    NFem-s/sseSPinf;

LEXICON NFem-s/sseSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^se #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^se #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^sen #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^se #;


LEXICON NFem/Sg
Staatsduma    NFem/SgSPinf;


LEXICON  NFem/SgSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;

LEXICON NFem_0_$
Tochter    NFem_0_$SPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_$SPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:+um^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:+um^ #;

LEXICON NFem_0_$e
Unterkunft    NFem_0_$eSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_$eSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural+Umlaut:+um^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural+Umlaut:+um^e #;

LEXICON NFem_0_e
Causa    NFem_0_eSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_eSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^e #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NFem_0_en
Chronik    NFem_0_enSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_enSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NFem_0_n
Chronologie    NFem_0_nSPinf;

LEXICON  NFem_0_nSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NFem_0_s
City    NFem_0_sSPinf;

LEXICON NFem_0_sSPinf
+Fem+NN+Nom+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Sg:0  #;
+Fem+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Fem+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;


LEXICON NMasc-ns
Wille    NMasc-nsSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-nsSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^n  #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^ns #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc-s/$sse
Vorschuss     NMasc-s/$sseSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-s/$sseSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0  #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NMasc-s/sse
Turnus    NMasc-s/sseSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-s/sseSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^se #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^se #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^sen #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^se #;

LEXICON NMasc-us/en
Zyklus    NMasc-us/enSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-us/enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:-us^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:-us^en #;

LEXICON NMasc-us/i
Terminus    NMasc-us/iSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc-us/iSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:-us^i #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:-us^i #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_0
Yoga    NMasc/Sg_0SPinf;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_0SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_es
Wust    NMasc/Sg_esSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_esSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:s #;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_s
Weizen    NMasc/Sg_sSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc/Sg_sSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:s #;

LEXICON NMasc_0_x
Prix    NMasc_0_xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_0_xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NMasc_en_en
Propagandist    NMasc_en_enSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_en_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$e
Präzedenzfall    NMasc_es_$eSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$er
Rand     NMasc_es_$erSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_es_$erSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^er #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^er #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ern #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^er #;


LEXICON NMasc_es_e
Rapport    NMasc_es_eSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_es_eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_es_en
Schmerz    NMasc_es_enSPinf;

LEXICON  NMasc_es_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_n_n
Schimpanse    NMasc_n_nSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_n_nSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$
Vater    NMasc_s_$SPinf;
Schwager    NMasc_s_$SPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$x
Wagen    NMasc_s_$xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_$xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;


LEXICON NMasc_s_0
Walliser    NMasc_s_0SPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_0SPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^0 #;


LEXICON NMasc_s_e
NMasc_s_eSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_eSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_en
Zensor    NMasc_s_enSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_enSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_n
Muskel    NMasc_s_nSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_nSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_s
Neonazi    NMasc_s_sSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_sSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;

LEXICON NMasc_s_x
Regen NMasc_s_xSPinf;

LEXICON NMasc_s_xSPinf
+Masc+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Masc+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Masc+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut-0/ien
Adverb    NNeut-0/ienSPinf;
